Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.30.700

Construction, remodeling, improvement, financing through bonds, authorized.

The board of regents of Washington State University is empowered, in accordance with the provisions of RCW 28B.30.700 through 28B.30.780, to provide for the construction, completion, reconstruction, remodeling, rehabilitation and improvement of buildings and facilities authorized by the legislature for the use of the university and to finance the payment thereof by bonds payable out of a special fund from revenues hereafter derived from the payment of building fees, gifts, bequests or grants, and such additional funds as the legislature may provide.

[ 1985 c 390 s 41; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.30.700. Prior: 1961 ex.s. c 12 s 1. Formerly RCW 28.80.500.]